test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_CW_jooweshk_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px1jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nijooweshkishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nijooweshkishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nijooweshkishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nijooweshkishiwaaibanan
     +Px1jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nijooweshkishiwaaibanag
     +Px1jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nijooweshkishiwaaibaning
     +Px1jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nijooweshkishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nijooweshkishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nijooweshkishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nijooweshkishiniibanan
     +Px1jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nijooweshkishiniibanag
     +Px1jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nijooweshkishiniibaning
     +Px1jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nijooweshkishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nijooweshkishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nijooweshkishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gijooweshkishinaanibanan
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gijooweshkishinaanibanag
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gijooweshkishinaanibaning
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gijooweshkishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gijooweshkishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gijooweshkishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gijooweshkishiwaaibanan
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gijooweshkishiwaaibanag
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gijooweshkishiwaaibaning
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gijooweshkishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gijooweshkishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gijooweshkishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gijooweshkishiniibanan
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gijooweshkishiniibanag
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gijooweshkishiniibaning
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gijooweshkishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gijooweshkishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gijooweshkishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ojooweshkishinaanibanan
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ojooweshkishinaanibanag
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ojooweshkishinaanibaning
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ojooweshkishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ojooweshkishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ojooweshkishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ojooweshkishiwaaibanan
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ojooweshkishiwaaibanag
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ojooweshkishiwaaibaning
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ojooweshkishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ojooweshkishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ojooweshkishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ojooweshkishiniibanan
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ojooweshkishiniibanag
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ojooweshkishiniibaning
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ojooweshkishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ojooweshkishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3jooweshk+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ojooweshkishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ijooweshkishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ijooweshkishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ijooweshkishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ijooweshkishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ijooweshkishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ijooweshkishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ijooweshkishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ijooweshkishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ijooweshkishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ijooweshkishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ijooweshkishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ijooweshkishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ijooweshkishiniibanan
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ijooweshkishiniibanag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ijooweshkishiniibaning
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ijooweshkishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ijooweshkishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefjooweshk+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ijooweshkishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: jooweshkensimishinaaniban
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: jooweshkensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: jooweshkensimishiwaaiban
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: jooweshkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: jooweshkensimishiniiban
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: jooweshkensimishini***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: jooweshkenhimishinaaniban
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: jooweshkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: jooweshkenhimishiwaaiban
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: jooweshkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: jooweshkenhimishiniiban
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: jooweshkenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: jooweshkensimishinaanan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: jooweshkensimishinaanag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: jooweshkensimishinaaning
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: jooweshkensimishiwaaan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: jooweshkensimishiwaaag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: jooweshkensimishiwaaing
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: jooweshkensimishinian
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: jooweshkensimishiniag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: jooweshkensimishiniing
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: jooweshkenhimishinaanan
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: jooweshkenhimishinaanag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: jooweshkenhimishinaaning
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: jooweshkenhimishiwaaan
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: jooweshkenhimishiwaaag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: jooweshkenhimishiwaaing
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: jooweshkenhimishinian
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: jooweshkenhimishiniag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: jooweshkenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: jooweshkensimishibanan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: jooweshkensimishibanag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: jooweshkensimishibaning
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkensimish***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkensimish***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkensimish***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: jooweshkenhimishibanan
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: jooweshkenhimishibanag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: jooweshkenhimishibaning
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkenhimish***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: jooweshkensiminaanibanan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: jooweshkensiminaanibanag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: jooweshkensiminaanibaning
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: jooweshkensimiwaaibanan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: jooweshkensimiwaaibanag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: jooweshkensimiwaaibaning
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: jooweshkensiminiibanan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: jooweshkensiminiibanag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: jooweshkensiminiibaning
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkensimini***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkensimini***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkensimini***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: jooweshkenhiminaanibanan
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: jooweshkenhiminaanibanag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: jooweshkenhiminaanibaning
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: jooweshkenhimiwaaibanan
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: jooweshkenhimiwaaibanag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: jooweshkenhimiwaaibaning
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: jooweshkenhiminiibanan
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: jooweshkenhiminiibanag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: jooweshkenhiminiibaning
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkenhimini***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkenhimini***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkenhimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: jooweshkensishinaanibanan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: jooweshkensishinaanibanag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: jooweshkensishinaanibaning
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: jooweshkensishiwaaibanan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: jooweshkensishiwaaibanag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: jooweshkensishiwaaibaning
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: jooweshkensishiniibanan
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: jooweshkensishiniibanag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: jooweshkensishiniibaning
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkensishini***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkensishini***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkensishini***idig, idog***ing
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: jooweshkenhishinaanibanan
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: jooweshkenhishinaanibanag
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: jooweshkenhishinaanibaning
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: jooweshkenhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: jooweshkenhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     jooweshk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: jooweshkenhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
